New York, session 2025-2026, S3907.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public housing law is amended by adding a new section 2 62 to read as follows: 3 § 62. Tenant meetings. Tenants' groups, committees or other tenants' 4 organizations comprised of tenants residing in housing authority 5 projects, conducting a meeting authorized pursuant to section two 6 hundred thirty of the real property law shall have the right to meet 7 without being required to pay a fee in any location on the premises 8 which is devoted to the common use of all tenants, including a community 9 or social room where use is normally subject to a fee, provided that 10 such meeting is conducted in a peaceful manner, at reasonable hours and 11 without obstructing access to the premises or facilities, and further 12 provided the tenants' groups, committees or other tenants' organizations 13 give three business days prior notice to the management office of the 14 housing project where the meeting is to take place. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07371-01-5